Utah statutes.
75-5a-111.   Single custodianship.

A transfer may be made only for one minor, and only one person may be the custodian.  All custodial property held under this part by the same custodian for the benefit of the same minor constitutes a single custodianship.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 1990 General Session

